Hawaii, session 2026, HB1523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§291C-33  Pedestrian-control signals.  Whenever special pedestrian-control signals exhibiting the words "Walk" or "Don't Walk"[,] or the symbols of a walking person or an upraised palm[, or a countdown timer] are in place, such signals shall indicate as follows: (1)  Walk or Walking Person.  Pedestrians facing such signal may proceed across the roadway in the direction of the signal and shall be given the right-of-way by the drivers of all vehicles; and (2)  Don't Walk or Upraised Palm.  No pedestrian shall start to cross the roadway in the direction of such signal, whether flashing or steady, but any pedestrian who has partially completed the pedestrian's crossing on the Walk or Walking Person signal shall complete the crossing to a sidewalk or safety island while the Don't Walk or Upraised Palm signal is showing[; and (3)  Countdown timer.  If the pedestrian-control signal is equipped with a countdown timer, no pedestrian shall start to cross the roadway in the direction of such signal once the countdown begins, but any pedestrian who has partially completed the pedestrian's crossing when the countdown begins shall complete the crossing to a sidewalk or safety island before the countdown timer ends]." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________